test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_1.gt-norm.yaml
     ñ'usägúng+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñ'usägúng
     ñ'usägúng+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúngga
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng
     ñ'usägúng+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúnggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+DIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúnggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúngs
     ñ'usägúng+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúngang
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúngganggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúnggangang
     ñ'usägúng+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggaangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñ'usägúngäsaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñ'usägúngäs
     ñ'usägúng+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngäsaang
     ñ'usägúng+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngäsga
     ñ'usägúng+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngäsaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúngäsaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasa'áa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasa'áang
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaasdláa
     ñ'usägúng+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaasdláang
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'uuj
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñ'usägúngäsaa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ujaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'uujaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngäsaa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngäsaa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñ'usägúngäseehl
     ñ'usägúng+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñ'usägúng'uu
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'wägan
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aawaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aawaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'waas
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñ'usägúng'aawaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'aawaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang'waang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúnggang'waa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'wägiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'wägaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'wägaangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñ'usägúng'waaäs
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsga
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa'uuj
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'waa'ujaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'waa'uujaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'waa'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñ'usägúng'waa'ahlanggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'waa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aawaa'ahlang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñ'usägúng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñ'usägúng'waa'ahl
     ñ'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñ'usägúng'waaäseehl
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'angga
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'anggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'anggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'ans
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñ'usägúng'aangaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'angang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'aangaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'anggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang'anggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúnggang'angang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'anggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'anggaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'anggaangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñ'usägúng'angäsaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñ'usägúng'angäs
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'angäsaang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'angäsga
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'angäsaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'angäsaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaa'áng
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúngang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'uuj
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñ'usägúng'angäsaa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'ujaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'uujaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'angäsaa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'aang'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aang'ahlanggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'angäsaa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'aang'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'aangaa'ahlang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñ'usägúng'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ñ'usägúng'aang'ahl
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñ'usägúng'angäseehl
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'uu
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'wägan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waas
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang'ang'waa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúnggang'ang'waang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúnggang'ang'waa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'wägiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'wägaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'wägaangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäs
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsga
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'uuj
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'ujaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñ'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñ'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
